Lecture1/en_ia_morphology_template.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+N	! Noun tag
        +Sg	! Singular
        +Pl	! Plural
 	+Poss	! Possessive form

LEXICON Root
	Nouns ; ! No input, no output

!
! NOUNS start here
!

LEXICON Nouns

cat	N ;
dog	N ;

church	  N_s ;
kiss	  N_s ;

beauty:beaut	N_y ;
sky:sk		N_y ;


! The noun lexica N and Num are used for stems without any alternation

LEXICON N
+N:0	Num ;

LEXICON Num
+Sg:0	PossWithS ;
+Pl:s	PossWithoutS ;

! The noun lexica N_s and Num_s are used for stems that end in a sibilant
! and need an extra inserted "e"

LEXICON N_s
+N:0	Num_s ;

LEXICON Num_s
+Sg:0	PossWithS ;
+Pl:es	PossWithoutS ;

! The noun lexica N_y and Num_y are used for stems with "y" -> "ie" alternation

LEXICON N_y
+N:0	Num_y ;

LEXICON Num_y
+Sg:y	PossWithS ;
+Pl:ies	PossWithoutS ;

! Possessive endings: usually the singular is 's and the plural is '

LEXICON PossWithS
+Poss:'s     # ;
	     # ; ! No ending: no input, no output

LEXICON PossWithoutS
+Poss:'	     # ;
	     # ; ! No ending: no input, no output

END
